Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-611
Department; forms; duty to supply; use of computer-generated forms; authorized.

The department shall supply all necessary blanks, forms, and instructions pertaining to the recording of births and deaths to physicians, hospitals, and funeral directors and embalmers. Upon written request, the department may authorize a funeral director and embalmer licensed in Nebraska to use computer-generated death certificate forms on paper supplied by the department which is of the same quality and identical in form established in department regulations for death certificates which are not computer-generated.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. IX, § 13, p. 783;

C.S.1922, § 8243;

Laws 1927, c. 166, § 8, p. 451;

C.S.1929, § 71-2415;

R.S.1943, § 71-611;

Laws 1953, c. 242, § 1, p. 832;

Laws 1959, c. 322, § 1, p. 1179;

Laws 1985, LB 42, § 5;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 49;

Laws 1993, LB 187, § 11;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 523;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 412.